Utah statutes.
11-42-202.   Requirements applicable to a notice of a proposed assessment
area designation.
(1)  Each notice required under Subsection 11-42-201(2)(a) shall:
(a)  state that the local entity proposes to:
(i)  designate one or more areas within the local entity's jurisdictional
boundaries as an assessment area;
(ii)  provide an improvement to property within the proposed assessment area;
and
(iii)  finance some or all of the cost of improvements by an assessment on
benefitted property within the assessment area;
(b)  describe the proposed assessment area by any reasonable method that
allows an owner of property in the proposed assessment area to determine that
the owner's property is within the proposed assessment area;
(c)  describe, in a general way, the improvements to be provided to the
assessment area, including:
(i)  the general nature of the improvements; and
(ii)  the general location of the improvements, by reference to streets or
portions or extensions of streets or by any other means that the governing
body chooses that reasonably describes the general location of the
improvements;
(d)  state the estimated cost of the improvements as determined by a project
engineer;
(e)  state that the local entity proposes to levy an assessment on benefitted
property within the assessment area to pay some or all of the cost of the
improvements according to the estimated direct and indirect benefits to the
property from the improvements;
(f)  state the assessment method by which the governing body proposes to levy
the assessment;
(g)  state:
(i)  the time within which and the location at which protests against
designation of the proposed assessment area or of the proposed improvements
are required to be filed; and
(ii)  the method by which the governing body will determine the number of
protests required to defeat the designation of the proposed assessment area or
acquisition or construction of the proposed improvements;
(h)  state the date, time, and place of the public hearing required in Section
11-42-204;
(i)  if the governing body elects to create and fund a reserve fund under
Section 11-42-702, include a description of:
(i)  how the reserve fund will be funded and replenished; and
(ii)  how remaining money in the reserve fund is to be disbursed upon full
payment of the bonds;
(j)  if the governing body intends to designate a voluntary assessment area,
include a property owner consent form that:
(i)  estimates the total assessment to be levied against the particular parcel
of property;
(ii)  describes any additional benefits that the governing body expects the
assessed property to receive from the improvements; and
(iii)  designates the date and time by which the fully executed consent form
is required to be submitted to the governing body;
(k)  if the local entity intends to levy an assessment to pay operation and
maintenance costs or for economic promotion activities, include:
(i)  a description of the operation and maintenance costs or economic
promotion activities to be paid by assessments and the initial estimated
annual assessment to be levied;
(ii)  a description of how the estimated assessment will be determined;
(iii)  a description of how and when the governing body will adjust the
assessment to reflect the costs of:
(A)  in accordance with Section 11-42-406, current economic promotion
activities; or
(B)  current operation and maintenance costs;
(iv)  a description of the method of assessment if different from the method
of assessment to be used for financing any improvement; and
(v)  a statement of the maximum number of years over which the assessment will
be levied for:
(A)  operation and maintenance costs; or
(B)  economic promotion activities; and
(l)  if the governing body intends to divide the proposed assessment area into
zones under Subsection 11-42-201(1)(b), include a description of the proposed
zones.
(2)  A notice required under Subsection 11-42-201(2)(a) may contain other
information that the governing body considers to be appropriate, including:
(a)  the amount or proportion of the cost of the improvement to be paid by the
local entity or from sources other than an assessment;
(b)  the estimated amount of each type of assessment for the various
improvements to be financed according to the method of assessment that the
governing body chooses; and
(c)  provisions for any improvements described in Subsection 11-42-102(22)(b).
(3)  Each notice required under Subsection 11-42-201(2)(a) shall:
(a) (i) (A)  be published in a newspaper of general circulation within the
local entity's jurisdictional boundaries, once a week for four consecutive
weeks, with the last publication at least five but not more than 20 days
before the deadline for filing protests specified in the notice under
Subsection (1)(g); or
(B)  if there is no newspaper of general circulation within the local entity's
jurisdictional boundaries, be posted in at least three public places within
the local entity's jurisdictional boundaries at least 20 but not more than 35
days before the deadline for filing protests specified in the notice under
Subsection (1)(g); and
(ii)  be published on the Utah Public Notice Website described in Section
63F-1-701 for four weeks before the deadline for filing protests specified in
the notice under Subsection (1)(g); and
(b)  be mailed, postage prepaid, within 10 days after the first publication or
posting of the notice under Subsection (3)(a) to each owner of property to be
assessed within the proposed assessment area at the property owner's mailing
address.
